Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5417
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Utilization Review Act is to establish requirements and standards of operation for certification of medical utilization review agents. It is proper for the state to oversee utilization review agents as a part of the state's regulation and supervision of the business of insurance and to encourage effective, efficient, and consistent utilization review.

Laws 1992, LB 428, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 44-5402;

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 2.